Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.156.020

Operation and administration of joint center.

The joint center for deployment and research in earth-abundant materials must be operated and administered as a multi-institutional education and research center, conducting research and development programs in various locations within Washington under the joint authority of the University of Washington and Washington State University. The initial administrative offices of the center shall be west of the crest of the Cascade mountains. In order to meet industry needs, the facilities and resources of the center must be made available to all four-year institutions of higher education. Resources include internships, on-the-job training, and research opportunities for undergraduate and graduate students and faculty.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 20 s 3.]